Mississippi statutes. Title 19. Counties and County Officers
Local Government Solid Waste Collection and Disposal Assistance Act of 1994

§ 19-5-107.
Short title; purpose.

This act [Laws, 1994, ch. 624] shall be known as the “Local Government Solid Waste Collection and Disposal Assistance Act of 1994” and is in response to concerns expressed by the Mississippi Municipal Association, the Mississippi Association of Supervisors and local governmental officials about their ability to provide solid waste management services in accordance with federal law and regulations without imposing an undue and inequitable financial burden on county and municipal residents.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 624, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 19-5-109.
Estimation of cost of garbage collection and disposal services; means of meeting costs; effect on contracts.

Each county and municipality shall make a good faith effort to estimate the cost of garbage and rubbish collection and disposal services. These costs may be met, in amounts necessary to defray the cost of the system, by any combination of generator fees, ad valorem tax revenues as authorized under Section 19-5-21 or Section 21-19-2, or county or municipal special funds as authorized under Section 19-5-21 or 21-19-2.

Nothing in Chapter 624, Laws of 1994, shall be construed to abrogate or cancel any contract that a county or a municipality has entered into for garbage or rubbish collection or disposal. If a county or municipality entered into a contract before April 1, 1994, and the term or period of performance of that contract does not exceed five (5) years, the county or municipality may continue to levy the ad valorem tax assessment in effect before April 1, 1994, to honor the contract for the term of that contract.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 624, § 2; Laws, 1996, ch. 536, § 3; Laws, 1997, ch. 423, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved March 24, 1997).